Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 15 Tasting Events

Effective date. —

This chapter became effective August 3, 2020.

3-15-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Licensed premises” means any premises in which any alcoholic beverages are sold in unbroken packages and shall include any premises which are required by law to be licensed to sell any alcoholic beverages in unbroken packages.

“Licensee” means the holder of a retail package liquor store license.

“Operator” means an owner, licensee, operator, manager, or person in charge of any licensed premises.

“Sample” means a small amount of any malt beverage, wine, or distilled spirits.

“Tasting event” means a scheduled event hosted by a licensee at which free samples may be provided and that may be open to the general public or limited by invitation.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-15-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 615, § 7/HB 879.

3-15-2.
Terms and conditions for limited tasting events.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, in all counties and municipalities in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, retail package liquor stores shall be authorized to conduct up to 52 tasting events per calendar year, subject to the following terms and conditions:

A tasting event shall only take place on the licensed premises and only at times at which such alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold on such licensed premises;

Only one tasting event per day may be held on the licensed premises and such tasting event shall not exceed four hours;

Only one type of alcoholic beverage may be served at a tasting event, either malt beverages, wine, or distilled spirits; provided, however, that more than one brand of such type of alcoholic beverage may be offered so long as not more than four packages are open at any one time;

If the tasting event is for malt beverages, a consumer shall not be served more than eight ounces of malt beverages during such tasting event. If the tasting event is for wine, a consumer shall not be served more than five ounces of wine during such tasting event. If the tasting event is for distilled spirits, a consumer shall not be served more than one and one-half ounces of distilled spirits during such tasting event;

Only alcoholic beverages that the licensee is licensed to sell on the licensed premises may be offered as part of a tasting event, and such alcoholic beverages shall be part of the licensee’s inventory;

Only food that is lawful to sell on the licensed premises, under this title or under any rules or regulations of the commissioner, may be served as part of a tasting event. Such food shall be offered at no cost to the consumer;

Any operator or employee of the licensee may refuse to provide any brand, type, or quantity of alcoholic beverage to any consumer;

The licensee shall notify the governing authority of the county or municipality in which the licensed premises is located prior to holding a tasting event;

Any broken package containing alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises that is not licensed for retail sales for consumption on the premises shall be kept locked in a secure room or cabinet by the operator of the licensed premises except when in use during a tasting event;

Representatives and salespersons of manufacturers or wholesalers may attend a tasting event; provided, however, that such representatives and salespersons shall not host the tasting event, pour any alcoholic beverage, or provide anything of value to any consumer or to the licensee or an employee of a licensee; and

Any other terms, conditions, and limitations as may be required or imposed by the governing authority of the county or municipality in which the licensed premises is located.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-15-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 615, § 7/HB 879.

3-15-3.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner shall promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as he or she may deem reasonable and necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-15-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 615, § 7/HB 879.

3-15-4.
Conditions or limitations on licenses for violations.

Upon a violation by a retail dealer of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, the commissioner shall have the power to place conditions or limitations on such retail dealer’s license and to modify or amend such conditions or limitations.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-15-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 615, § 7/HB 879.